Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-1336
Distance education
equipment reimbursement; application; contents; repayment; when; department
decisions; appeal.

(1) For fiscal years 2007-08
through 2013-14, the State Department of Education shall provide distance
education equipment reimbursement to school districts and educational service
units from the Education Innovation Fund as provided in this section. Such
reimbursements shall be for hardware or software purchased either by, or on
behalf of, the school district or educational service unit seeking reimbursement
after July 14, 2006, for use in distance education and shall be limited to
a total through fiscal year 2013-14 of twenty thousand dollars multiplied
by the number of high school buildings for each school district and twenty
thousand dollars for each educational service unit office with a distance
education classroom, except that no educational service unit shall count more
than one office with a distance education classroom for each four thousand
square miles within the boundaries of the educational service unit. If a school
district has one or more former high school buildings that are no longer being
used as high school buildings due to a school district merger and such buildings
have distance education classrooms at the time of application, such buildings
shall be deemed high school buildings for the purposes of this subsection.
The reimbursements may include installation costs for such hardware or software. To qualify for distance education equipment reimbursement, the
school district or the educational service unit shall
access Network Nebraska prior
to the application for reimbursement. Applications for distance education equipment reimbursement shall
be submitted on or before July
1, 2013, for reimbursements to be made in fiscal year 2013-14 on
a form specified by the department and shall include:

(a) A description of the hardware or software purchased and
how the hardware or software will be used for distance education;

(b) Copies of receipts for the purchases to be reimbursed;

(c) For purchases made on behalf of a school district or
educational service unit, evidence that such purchase was made on behalf of
such school district or educational service unit and that such school district
or educational service unit paid directly or indirectly for such purchase;
and

(d) For school districts, a commitment to either send or
receive two-way interactive video distance education courses through the Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council each
semester, or the equivalent of two semester courses each year, for four consecutive
years and to apply for distance education incentives pursuant to section 79-1337
or to provide any other evidence required by the department to show that the
commitment was met.

(2) On or before August 1 of each year, the department shall
certify the reimbursements to be paid to each school district or educational
service unit on or before September 1 of each year.

(3) The department shall use the applications for distance
education incentives submitted pursuant to section 79-1337 and any other information
requested by the department pursuant to rules and regulations of the department
to verify that each school district that received a reimbursement completes
the commitment to either send or receive two-way interactive video distance
education courses through the council for four years. Any school district
failing to complete such commitment shall repay the Education Innovation Fund
for the amount of any reimbursements received pursuant to this section. On
or before September 1 of each year, the department shall notify any school
district failing to complete the commitment for the prior school year that
repayment of the reimbursement is required and the amount of such repayment.
Repayments shall be due on or before the immediately following December 31.
Late repayments shall accrue interest at the rate prescribed in section 45-104.02
from the date of the initial reimbursement.

(4) On or before October 1 of each year, a school district
or educational service unit may appeal the denial of reimbursements or a school
district may appeal the requirement to repay reimbursements to the State Board
of Education. The board shall allow a representative of the school district
or educational service unit an opportunity to present information concerning
the appeal to the board at the November board meeting. If the board finds
that the department denied the reimbursement in error, the department shall
pay the district or educational service unit from the Education Innovation
Fund as soon as practical the amount which was denied in error. If the board
finds that the department erred in notifying a school district that a reimbursement
is required to be repaid, such notification shall be void.

(5) The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2006, LB 1208, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 29;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 52;

Laws 2013, LB410, § 14.
May 30, 2013